tests/possessives.yaml
 "Noun аас":
    аас<n><px1sg><nom> : аксым
    аас<n><px1sg><gen> : аксымның
    аас<n><px1sg><dat> : аксымга
    аас<n><px1sg><acc> : аксымны
    аас<n><px1sg><loc> : аксымда
    аас<n><px1sg><abl> : аксымдан
    аас<n><px1sg><all> : аксымче
    аас<n><px2sg><nom> : аксың
    аас<n><px2sg><gen> : аксыңның
    аас<n><px2sg><dat> : аксыңга
    аас<n><px2sg><acc> : аксыңны
    аас<n><px2sg><loc> : аксыңда
    аас<n><px2sg><abl> : аксыңдан
    аас<n><px2sg><all> : аксыңче
    аас<n><px3sp><nom> : аксы
    аас<n><px3sp><gen> : аксының
    аас<n><px3sp><dat> : аксынга
    аас<n><px3sp><acc> : аксын
    аас<n><px3sp><loc> : аксында
    аас<n><px3sp><abl> : аксындан
    аас<n><px3sp><all> : аксынче
    аас<n><px1pl><nom> : аксывыс
    аас<n><px1pl><gen> : аксывыстың
    аас<n><px1pl><dat> : аксывыска
    аас<n><px1pl><acc> : аксывысты
    аас<n><px1pl><loc> : аксывыста
    аас<n><px1pl><abl> : аксывыстан
    аас<n><px1pl><all> : аксывысче
    аас<n><px2pl><nom> : аксыңар
    аас<n><px2pl><gen> : аксыңарның
    аас<n><px2pl><dat> : аксыңарга
    аас<n><px2pl><acc> : аксыңарны
    аас<n><px2pl><loc> : аксыңарда
    аас<n><px2pl><abl> : аксыңардан
    аас<n><px2pl><all> : аксыңарже
    аас<n><pl><px1sg><nom> : аастарым
    аас<n><pl><px1sg><gen> : аастарымның
    аас<n><pl><px1sg><dat> : аастарымга
    аас<n><pl><px1sg><acc> : аастарымны
    аас<n><pl><px1sg><loc> : аастарымда
    аас<n><pl><px1sg><abl> : аастарымдан
    аас<n><pl><px1sg><all> : аастарымче
    аас<n><pl><px2sg><nom> : аастарың
    аас<n><pl><px2sg><gen> : аастарыңның
    аас<n><pl><px2sg><dat> : аастарыңга
    аас<n><pl><px2sg><acc> : аастарыңны
    аас<n><pl><px2sg><loc> : аастарыңда
    аас<n><pl><px2sg><abl> : аастарыңдан
    аас<n><pl><px2sg><all> : аастарыңче
    аас<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : аастары
    аас<n><pl><px3sp><gen> : аастарының
    аас<n><pl><px3sp><dat> : аастарынга
    аас<n><pl><px3sp><acc> : аастарын
    аас<n><pl><px3sp><loc> : аастарында
    аас<n><pl><px3sp><abl> : аастарындан
    аас<n><pl><px3sp><all> : аастарынче
    аас<n><pl><px1pl><nom> : аастарывыс
    аас<n><pl><px1pl><gen> : аастарывыстың
    аас<n><pl><px1pl><dat> : аастарывыска
    аас<n><pl><px1pl><acc> : аастарывысты
    аас<n><pl><px1pl><loc> : аастарывыста
    аас<n><pl><px1pl><abl> : аастарывыстан
    аас<n><pl><px1pl><all> : аастарывысче
    аас<n><pl><px2pl><nom> : аастарыңар
    аас<n><pl><px2pl><gen> : аастарыңарның
    аас<n><pl><px2pl><dat> : аастарыңарга
    аас<n><pl><px2pl><acc> : аастарыңарны
    аас<n><pl><px2pl><loc> : аастарыңарда
    аас<n><pl><px2pl><abl> : аастарыңардан
    аас<n><pl><px2pl><all> : аастарыңарже

 "Noun оол":
    оол<n><px1sg><nom> : оглум
    оол<n><px1sg><gen> : оглумнуң
    оол<n><px1sg><dat> : оглумга
    оол<n><px1sg><acc> : оглумну
    оол<n><px1sg><loc> : оглумда
    оол<n><px1sg><abl> : оглумдан
    оол<n><px1sg><all> : оглумче
    оол<n><px2sg><nom> : оглуң
    оол<n><px2sg><gen> : оглуңнуң
    оол<n><px2sg><dat> : оглуңга
    оол<n><px2sg><acc> : оглуңну
    оол<n><px2sg><loc> : оглуңда
    оол<n><px2sg><abl> : оглуңдан
    оол<n><px2sg><all> : оглуңче
    оол<n><px3sp><nom> : оглу
    оол<n><px3sp><gen> : оглунуң
    оол<n><px3sp><dat> : оглунга
    оол<n><px3sp><acc> : оглун
    оол<n><px3sp><loc> : оглунда
    оол<n><px3sp><abl> : оглундан
    оол<n><px3sp><all> : оглунче
    оол<n><px1pl><nom> : оглувус
    оол<n><px1pl><gen> : оглувустуң
    оол<n><px1pl><dat> : оглувуска
    оол<n><px1pl><acc> : оглувусту
    оол<n><px1pl><loc> : оглувуста
    оол<n><px1pl><abl> : оглувустан
    оол<n><px1pl><all> : оглувусче
    оол<n><px2pl><nom> : оглуңар
    оол<n><px2pl><gen> : оглуңарның
    оол<n><px2pl><dat> : оглуңарга
    оол<n><px2pl><acc> : оглуңарны
    оол<n><px2pl><loc> : оглуңарда
    оол<n><px2pl><abl> : оглуңардан
    оол<n><px2pl><all> : оглуңарже
    оол<n><pl><px1sg><nom> : оолдарым
    оол<n><pl><px1sg><gen> : оолдарымның
    оол<n><pl><px1sg><dat> : оолдарымга
    оол<n><pl><px1sg><acc> : оолдарымны
    оол<n><pl><px1sg><loc> : оолдарымда
    оол<n><pl><px1sg><abl> : оолдарымдан
    оол<n><pl><px1sg><all> : оолдарымче
    оол<n><pl><px2sg><nom> : оолдарың
    оол<n><pl><px2sg><gen> : оолдарыңның
    оол<n><pl><px2sg><dat> : оолдарыңга
    оол<n><pl><px2sg><acc> : оолдарыңны
    оол<n><pl><px2sg><loc> : оолдарыңда
    оол<n><pl><px2sg><abl> : оолдарыңдан
    оол<n><pl><px2sg><all> : оолдарыңче
    оол<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : оолдары
    оол<n><pl><px3sp><gen> : оолдарының
    оол<n><pl><px3sp><dat> : оолдарынга
    оол<n><pl><px3sp><acc> : оолдарын
    оол<n><pl><px3sp><loc> : оолдарында
    оол<n><pl><px3sp><abl> : оолдарындан
    оол<n><pl><px3sp><all> : оолдарынче
    оол<n><pl><px1pl><nom> : оолдарывыс
    оол<n><pl><px1pl><gen> : оолдарывыстың
    оол<n><pl><px1pl><dat> : оолдарывыска
    оол<n><pl><px1pl><acc> : оолдарывысты
    оол<n><pl><px1pl><loc> : оолдарывыста
    оол<n><pl><px1pl><abl> : оолдарывыстан
    оол<n><pl><px1pl><all> : оолдарывысче
    оол<n><pl><px2pl><nom> : оолдарыңар
    оол<n><pl><px2pl><gen> : оолдарыңарның
    оол<n><pl><px2pl><dat> : оолдарыңарга
    оол<n><pl><px2pl><acc> : оолдарыңарны
    оол<n><pl><px2pl><loc> : оолдарыңарда
    оол<n><pl><px2pl><abl> : оолдарыңардан
    оол<n><pl><px2pl><all> : оолдарыңарже

 "Noun конкурс":
    конкурс<n><px3sp><nom> : конкурузу
    конкурс<n><px3sp><all> : конкурузунче
    конкурс<n><px3sp><dat> : конкурузунга
    конкурс<n><px3sp><gen> : конкурузунуң

 "Noun комплекс": 
    комплекс<n><px3sp><nom> : комплекизи
    комплекс<n><px3sp><dat> : комплекизинге
    комплекс<n><px3sp><all> : комплекизинче

 "Noun класс": 
    класс<n><px1sg><gen> : клазымның 
    класс<n><px1sg><nom> : клазым 
    класс<n><px3sp><abl> : клазындан 
    класс<n><px3sp><acc> : клазын 
    класс<n><px3sp><all> : клазынче 
    класс<n><px3sp><dat> : клазынга 
    класс<n><px3sp><gen> : клазының 
    класс<n><px3sp><loc> : клазында 
    класс<n><px3sp><nom> : клазы 
    класс<n><px1pl><dat> : клазывыска 
    класс<n><px1pl><nom> : клазывыс 
    класс<n><px2pl><nom> : клазыңар 
    класс<n><pl><px3sp><acc> : класстарын 
    класс<n><pl><px3sp><all> : класстарынче 
    класс<n><pl><px3sp><dat> : класстарынга 
    класс<n><pl><px3sp><gen> : класстарының 
    класс<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : класстары 

 "Noun артист":
    артист<n><px3sp><nom> : артизи

 "Noun эът":
    эът<n><px3sp><nom> : эъди
    эът<n><px3sp><gen> : эъдиниң
    эът<n><px3sp><dat> : эъдинге
    эът<n><px3sp><acc> : эъдин
    эът<n><px3sp><loc> : эъдинде
    эът<n><px3sp><abl> : эъдинден
    эът<n><px3sp><all> : эъдинче

 "Miscellaneous":
    тавак<n><px1sg><nom> : таваам
    тавак<n><px2sg><nom> : тавааң
    тавак<n><px3sp><nom> : таваа
    балык<n><px1sg><nom> : балыым
    балык<n><px2sg><nom> : балыың
    балык<n><px3sp><nom> : балыы
    билиг<n><px1sg><nom> : билиим
    билиг<n><px2sg><nom> : билииң
    билиг<n><px3sp><nom> : билии
    уруг<n><px1sg><nom> : уруум
    уруг<n><px2sg><nom> : урууң
    уруг<n><px3sp><nom> : уруу
    белек<n><px1sg><nom> : белээм
    белек<n><px2sg><nom> : белээң
    белек<n><px3sp><nom> : белээ
    өг<n><px1sg><nom> : өөм
    өг<n><px2sg><nom> : өөң
    өг<n><px3sp><nom> : өө
    өк<n><px1sg><nom> : өгүм
    өк<n><px2sg><nom> : өгүң
    өк<n><px3sp><nom> : өгү
    айтырыг<n><px3sp><nom> : айтырыы
    каът<n><px3sp><loc> : каъдында
    аът<n><px3sp><gen> : аъдының
    участок<n><px3sp><dat> : участогунга
    өң<n><px3sp><nom> : өңү
    кат<n><px1sg><nom> : катым
    кат<n><px2sg><nom> : катың
    кат<n><px3sp><nom> : каты
    бет<n><px3sp><loc> : бетинде
    область<n><px3sp><gen> : облазының
    область<n><px3sp><loc> : облазында
    область<n><px3sp><dat> : облазынга
    область<n><px3sp><all> : облазынче
    область<n><px3sp><abl> : облазындан
    бет<n><px3sp><loc> : бетинде
